Wyoming statutes. Title 10 Aeronautics
Chapter 5 Municipal and County Airports

Cross references. —

As to construction, maintenance and improvement of public airports, aircraft landing strips and related facilities, see art. 16, § 11, Wyo. Const.

As to borrowing and issuance of bonds by cities and towns for airports, see §§

15-7-112

through

15-7-114

.

As to county airports, see §

18-9-101

et seq.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

8A Am. Jur. 2d Aviation §§ 83 to 107.

Casting light by airport on another's premises as a nuisance, 5 ALR2d 705, 79 ALR3d 253.

Dust from operation of airport as nuisance, 24 ALR2d 194, 79 ALR3d 253.

Airport operator's rights and remedies as to uses of adjoining land interfering with aircraft operation; use as nuisance, 25 ALR2d 1454.

Validity, construction and operation of airport operator's grant of exclusive or discriminatory privilege or concession, 40 ALR2d 1060.

Liability of owner of wires, poles or structures struck by aeroplane for resulting injury or damage, 48 ALR2d 1462.

Liability of municipality for torts in connection with airport, 66 ALR2d 634.

Validity of municipal regulation of aircraft flight paths or altitudes, 36 ALR3d 1314.

Municipal power to lease or sublet airport, 47 ALR3d 19.

Airport operations or flight of aircraft as nuisance, 79 ALR3d 253.

Airport operations liability insurance, 92 ALR3d 1267.

Zoning regulations limiting use of property near airport as taking of property, 18 ALR4th 542.

Airport operations or flight of aircraft as constituting taking or damaging of property, 22 ALR4th 863.

Liability of United States for negligence of air traffic controller 46 ALR Fed 24.

2A C.J.S. Aeronautics and Aerospace §§ 53 to 86.